Tennessee, session 114, HB2490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-202(a)(3), is amended by
deleting subdivision (C) and substituting:
(C)
(i) This subdivision (a)(3) shall not prohibit two (2) or more relatives from
working for the LEA. If two (2) or more employees who are relatives are within
the same direct line of supervision, or become within the same direct line of
supervision by marriage or promotion, then the director of schools shall attempt
to resolve the issue by transfer of one (1) of the employees. If the director finds
that transfer is not feasible, or is not in the best interest of students, then an
alternate evaluation plan must be devised for one (1) of the employees.
(ii) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(3)(C)(i), an LEA shall not employ a
person who is a relative of the LEA's director of schools or a relative of a member
of the LEA's local board of education unless the commissioner of education
approves the relative's employment in writing. This subdivision (a)(3)(C)(ii):
(a) Applies to all offers of employment and employment decisions
made by an LEA on or after July 1, 2025;
(b) Does not affect offers of employment or employment
decisions made by an LEA before July 1, 2025; and
HB2490
000026
- 1 -

(c) Does not excuse a member of the LEA's local board of
education or the LEA's director of schools from having to comply with the
declaration and notice requirements outlined in subdivision (a)(3)(A).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000026